Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ast_ES.dic
abanicar/ADG
abastar/ADG
aberruyar/ADG
abirolar/ADG
abobizar/ADG
aboquiar/ADG
abrasar/ADG
abucar/ADG
aburullar/ADG
acalar/ADG
acanalar/ADG
acarapanar/ADG
acarretonar/ADG
acaxar/ADG
acericar/ADG
achicharrar/ADG
achular/ADG
acobardar/ADG
acoldar/ADG
acomplexar/ADG
acorcollar/ADG
acorripiar/ADG
acoxancar/ADG
acubixar/ADG
acurriar/ADG
adautar/ADG
admirar/ADG
aereotresportar/ADG
afariñar/ADG
afenar/ADG
afilvanar/ADG
aflorar/ADG
aforciar/ADG
afozar/ADG
afurriar/ADG
agalafar/ADG
agasayar/ADG
agorgoyar/ADG
agrillandar/ADG
aguaxar/ADG
agurrinar/ADG
airar/ADG
alborar/ADG
alegar/ADG
aliñonar/ADG
allangostar/ADG
allevantar/ADG
allombar/ADG
allunizar/ADG
alquitranar/ADG
amaconar/ADG
amanerar/ADG
amarguxar/ADG
amasuñar/ADG
amburadar/ADG
amenudar/ADG
amilanar/ADG
amontalgar/ADG
amorosar/ADG
amoscar/ADG
amplificar/ADG
anachar/ADG
andamiar/ADG
angariellar/ADG
anochecer/ADG
anubrir/ADG
añerar/ADG
apacionar/ADG
apalpayar/ADG
apañar/ADG
aparucar/ADG
apavoriar/ADG
apegar/ADG
apelotonar/ADG
aperrillar/ADG
apiancar/ADG
apigazar/ADG
apipiolar/ADG
aplupinar/ADG
apolistronar/ADG
aporretar/ADG
apotelar/ADG
apretuxar/ADG
apuñalar/ADG
arbelar/ADG
argaxar/ADG
armonizar/ADG
arralentar/ADG
arrañar/ADG
arratigar/ADG
arrebuscar/ADG
arreflundir/ADG
arrellumar/ADG
arrepostiar/ADG
arreyar/ADG
arringlerar/ADG
arrollicar/ADG
arrudar/ADG
asaltar/ADG
aseñardar/ADG
asistir/ADG
asombrar/ADG
aspirar/ADG
atacañar/ADG
atapar/ADG
atarraquitar/ADG
atenebrar/ADG
atesteronar/ADG
atizar/ADG
atontecer/ADG
atortobexar/ADG
atracar/ADG
atristar/ADG
atrusgar/ADG
augurar/ADG
avalumbiar/ADG
averdosar/ADG
avieyecer/ADG
axelar/ADG
axudicar/ADG
azafranar/ADG
azorretar/ADG
babayar/DG
balanzar/DG
barañar/DG
barrenar/DG
bastir/DG
beatificar/DG
bichar/DG
blasfemar/DG
bolichar/DG
botonar/DG
bromiar/DG
burocratizar/DG
cacarañar/DG
cafetiar/DG
calcetar/DG
calicatiar/DG
camburar/DG
candiliar/DG
canturriar/DG
carbonatar/DG
carmenar/DG
carretar/DG
castañoletiar/DG
cavilgar/DG
celebrar/DG
cepiyar/DG
chamizar/DG
chaplicar/DG
charrapiar/DG
chingar/DG
chistar/DG
chuchuriar/DG
ciclostilar/DG
cinchar/DG
cisgar/DG
clavichar/DG
coeditar/DG
colingar/DG
comentar/DG
compendiar/DG
conceder/DG
confechar/DG
conquistar/DG
contemporizar/DG
convalidar/DG
copiar/DG
corpuscular/DG
cosigañar/DG
criticar/DG
cuartiar/DG
culbricar/DG
curviar/DG
debalar/DG
declarar/DG
deitar/DG
demudar/DG
deprimir/DG
derrubiar/DG
desacaviar/DG
desacreitar/DG
desafinar/DG
desagraviar/DG
desallugar/DG
desamortizar/DG
desapacienciar/DG
desapontonar/DG
desarnar/DG
desaseñorar/DG
desatorcar/DG
desaxerar/DG
descalzar/DG
desciñir/DG
desconfiar/DG
descubrir/DG
desembordelar/DG
desempenar/DG
desencamar/DG
desencordelar/DG
desenfariñar/DG
desengolar/DG
desenllortar/DG
desentelar/DG
desentrollar/DG
desesperar/DG
desfoxancar/DG
desiguar/DG
desmangar/DG
desnivelar/DG
desorientar/DG
desplasmar/DG
desterciar/DG
desuñar/DG
devolar/DG
dignificar/DG
diseccionar/DG
divisar/DG
dotar/DG
edrar/ADG
embaecer/ADG
embaranzar/ADG
embarruntar/ADG
embicar/ADG
embordelar/ADG
embravecer/ADG
emburniar/ADG
empadronar/ADG
empañar/ADG
emparchar/ADG
empatrañar/ADG
empellizcar/ADG
emperruñar/ADG
empinar/ADG
emponderar/ADG
emprecipiar/ADG
enarcar/ADG
encadexar/ADG
encalorar/ADG
encanecer/ADG
encapiellar/ADG
encarecer/ADG
encartiar/ADG
encegolar/ADG
enchambarilar/ADG
enchumbar/ADG
encloyar/ADG
encontar/ADG
encoscar/ADG
encucuruxar/ADG
encuxar/ADG
endomingar/ADG
enfarinar/ADG
enfilar/ADG
enfontanar/ADG
enfrentar/ADG
engalguiar/ADG
engarabecer/ADG
engarranchar/ADG
englobar/ADG
engorguyar/ADG
engrifañar/ADG
engudellar/ADG
enguruñar/ADG
enllanar/ADG
enllordiar/ADG
enmazcarar/ADG
enquillotrar/ADG
enrasar/ADG
enreyar/ADG
enrollugar/ADG
ensalendar/ADG
ensonsañar/ADG
entalanguerar/ADG
entaponar/ADG
entepeñerar/ADG
entocar/ADG
entracamundiar/ADG
entrechar/ADG
entresemar/ADG
entufar/ADG
envarar/ADG
enviciayar/ADG
enxaguar/ADG
enxobexar/ADG
enzafascar/ADG
enzorronar/ADG
esbabayar/ADG
esbandolar/ADG
esbarrar/ADG
esbeberiar/ADG
esblanquecer/ADG
esboyar/ADG
esbufarayar/ADG
escabildar/ADG
escaciplar/ADG
escagayar/ADG
escaldoberiar/ADG
escamisar/ADG
escandelar/ADG
escapiciar/ADG
escarbazar/ADG
escargachar/ADG
escarpintexar/ADG
escartar/ADG
escaxestar/ADG
escelellar/ADG
escimar/ADG
escogollar/ADG
escollimiar/ADG
escontonar/ADG
escorrentar/ADG
escotonar/ADG
escuartar/ADG
escuenciar/ADG
escupitar/ADG
fuyir/DG
llapacanar/DG
llibrar/DG
madrar/DG
manchar/DG
manxar/DG
mardomiar/DG
mastigar/DG
mazcuntar/DG
melecinar/DG
mermeyar/DG
milimetrar/DG
mocar/DG
montar/DG
mostiar/DG
murmurar/DG
nalar/DG
nartar/DG
nevicar/DG
notificar/DG
ñamoricar/DG
ñublinar/DG
olvidar/ADG
orlar/ADG
pacar/DG
palmar/DG
paticar/DG
pedriscar/DG
penuriar/DG
perfumar/DG
pescozar/DG
pidiguñar/DG
pinganiellar/DG
pisar/DG
platigar/DG
politiquiar/DG
posiar/DG
predeterminar/DG
presaxar/DG
principiar/DG
prometer/DG
publicar/DG
quebrar/DG
rabexar/DG
radicalizar/DG
ranar/DG
rapizar/DG
rastrar/DG
reagrupar/DG
rebelar/DG
rebordar/DG
recallar/DG
recimblar/DG
recostinar/DG
reduplicar/DG
refeletiar/DG
refrescar/DG
reguilar/DG
rellamber/DG
remangar/DG
remitir/DG
renegrir/DG
repatriar/DG
repletar/DG
repuliquiar/DG
rescaldar/DG
resfriar/DG
resplandecer/DG
resultar/DG
retolicar/DG
retumbeyar/DG
revisar/DG
rexuntar/DG
rinchar/DG
rizar/DG
romanar/DG
rotular/DG
rungar/DG
safar/DG
samartinar/DG
sayar/DG
sellar/DG
sesear/DG
sintetizar/DG
sobreimprimir/DG
socozar/DG
solidificar/DG
somantar/DG
sonsoniar/DG
sorradiar/DG
sotar/DG
subordinar/DG
sumir/DG
sustanciar/DG
tabular/DG
tanguir/DG
taragañar/DG
tartaxear/DG
tentar/DG
tintar/DG
toquetiar/DG
tracamundiar/DG
trebeyar/DG
treslliterar/DG
trimbir/DG
tumecer/DG
urriar/ADG
vedar/DG
viar/DG
xacer/DG
xebar/DG
xiringar/DG
xurniar/DG
zapurrir/DG
zurriar/DG
